Wisconsin, session 2025, SB916.
do enact as follows:Law Revision Committee prefatory note: This bill is a remedial legislation proposal, requested by the Elections Commission and introduced by the Law Revision Committee under s. 13.83 (1) (c) 4. and 5., stats. After careful consideration of the various provisions of the bill, the Law Revision Committee has determined that this bill makes minor substantive changes in the statutes, and that these changes are desirable as a matter of public policy.SB916,11Section 1. 5.60 (3) (ag) of the statutes is amended to read:SB916,2,625.60 (3) (ag) Except as authorized in s. 5.655, there shall be a separate ballot 3giving the names of all candidates for city offices, printed in the same form as 4prescribed by the commission under s. 7.08 (1) (a). City election ballots may vary in 5form to conform to the law under which an election is held. Sufficient space shall be 6provided on the ballot for write-in candidates.Note: This Section requires ballots for city elections to provide sufficient space for write-in candidates.SB916,27Section 2. 5.62 (1) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB916,3,885.62 (1) (a) At the partisan primary, the following ballot shall be provided for 9the nomination of candidates of recognized political parties for national, state and 10county offices and independent candidates for state office in each ward, in the same 11form as prescribed by the commission under s. 7.08 (1) (a), except as authorized in s. 125.655. The ballots shall be made up of the several party tickets with each party 13entitled to participate in the primary under par. (b) or sub. (2) having its own ballot, 14except as authorized in s. 5.655. The ballots shall be secured together at the 15bottom. The party ballot of the party receiving the most votes for president or 16governor at the last general election shall be on top with the other parties arranged 1in descending order based on their vote for president or governor at the last general 2election. The ballots of parties qualifying under sub. (2) shall be placed after the 3parties qualifying under par. (b), in the same order in which the parties filed 4petitions with the commission. Any ballot required under par. (b) 2. shall be placed 5next in order. At polling places where voting machines are used, each party shall be 6represented in one or more separate columns or rows on the ballot. At polling 7places where an electronic voting system is used other than an electronic voting 8machine, each party may be represented in separate columns or rows on the ballot.Note: This Section deletes a provision that requires independent candidates for state office to appear on partisan primary ballots.SB916,39Section 3. 6.34 (3) (a) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:SB916,3,11106.34 (3) (a) 1. A current and valid operator’s license issued under ch. 343, 11including a receipt constituting a temporary operator’s license.Note: This Section allows a receipt, issued by the department of transportation, that constitutes a temporary operator’s license to be used as proof of residency for the purpose of voter registration.SB916,412Section 4. 6.34 (3) (a) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:SB916,3,14136.34 (3) (a) 2. A current and valid identification card issued under s. 343.50, 14including a receipt constituting a temporary identification card.Note: This Section allows a receipt, issued by the department of transportation, that constitutes a temporary identification card to be used as proof of residency for the purpose of voter registration.SB916,3,1515